Hawaii statutes.
§334-24 Admission; discharge; civil
liability. No person shall be admitted to, detained at, or discharged from
any psychiatric facility except as provided in this chapter and in chapters
571, 704 and 706. [L 1967, c 259, pt of §1; HRS §334-24; am L 1976, c 130, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next